Hawaii statutes.
§354D-5 Advisory committee. (a) There
is established within the department a committee to be known as the
correctional industries advisory committee. This advisory committee shall
advise the department of the feasibility of establishing venture agreements
with private sector businesses to utilize the services of qualified,
able-bodied inmates pursuant to section 354D-13.

(b) The advisory committee shall consist of
nine members who shall be appointed by the governor in accordance with section
26-34. The governor shall designate a member to be chairperson of the advisory
committee. The director or a designee shall serve as an ex officio[,]
nonvoting member of the advisory committee. In establishing the advisory
committee, the governor shall appoint at least two members representing private
sector businesses and two members representing labor unions. The members shall
serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including
travel expenses, that are necessary for the performance of their duties. [L
1990, c 341, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 194, §1; am L 1996, c 158, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next